New York, session 2025-2026, S671.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The vehicle and traffic law is amended by adding a new 2 section 1640-t to read as follows: 3 § 1640-t. Residential parking systems in the city of New York. 1. 4 Notwithstanding the provisions of any law to the contrary, the city of 5 New York may, by adoption of a local law or ordinance, provide for 6 certain residential parking permit systems and fix and require the 7 payment of fees applicable to parking within the area of the city in 8 which such parking systems are in effect in accordance with the 9 provisions of this section. 10 2. Such residential parking permit systems may be established within 11 that area of the city of New York within certain neighborhoods, includ- 12 ing but not limited to, Washington Heights, Harlem, Morningside Heights, 13 Upper West Side, East Harlem, and Upper East Side. 14 3. The city of New York may undertake a study on the effectiveness of 15 such programs on parking access taking into consideration: 16 (a) Traffic flow and parking availability in the areas immediately 17 surrounding the central business district; 18 (b) Equity issues and household income in relation to the cost of 19 parking permits; and 20 (c) Environmental impact of emissions and air pollution. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02816-01-5 S. 671 2 1 4. Notwithstanding the foregoing, no permit shall be required on 2 streets where the adjacent properties are zoned for commercial or retail 3 use or in metered parking spaces. 4 5. The local law or ordinance providing for such residential parking 5 systems shall: 6 (a) set forth the factors necessitating the enactment of such parking 7 systems; 8 (b) provide that motor vehicles registered pursuant to section four 9 hundred four-a of this chapter shall be exempt from any permit require- 10 ment; 11 (c) provide the times of the day and days of the week during which 12 permit requirements shall be in effect; and 13 (d) provide the schedule of fees to be paid for such permits. 14 6. No ordinance shall be adopted pursuant to this section until a 15 public hearing thereon has been had in the same manner as required for 16 public hearings on a local law pursuant to the municipal home rule law. 17 7. The provisions of this section shall not apply to any state highway 18 maintained by the state. 19 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire December 20 1, 2032, when upon such date the provisions of this act shall be deemed 21 repealed, provided that any such local law or ordinance enacted pursuant 22 to this act shall remain in full force and effect only until December 1, 23 2032.